Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-416
Appeal; procedure.

Any person in interest who is dissatisfied with the decision of the Commissioner of Labor may appeal the decision, and the decision shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1929, c. 138, § 1, p. 494;

C.S.1929, § 48-412;

R.S.1943, § 48-416;

Laws 1969, c. 400, § 5, p. 1392;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 84.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.